Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7501.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings of Fact and Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to support the mental health and emotional well-being of
children and youth through investments in out-of-school time (“OST”) settings, recognizing OST
programs as essential, community-based spaces that provide connection, stability, and resilience
during a period of heightened need and reduced public supports.
Rhode Island continues to experience significant mental health challenges among children
and adolescents that affect well-being, school engagement, family stability, and long-term
outcomes. In April 2022, leading pediatric and behavioral health organizations in the state declared
a Rhode Island State of Emergency in Child and Adolescent Mental Health. These challenges have
been compounded by reductions in federal funding for schools and student support services,
increasing pressure on local and community-based systems to meet growing needs with fewer
resources.
Out-of-school time programs offer trusted, relationship-based environments where youth
spend substantial time outside of the school day. These programs are embedded within the
communities they serve and frequently employ staff, mentors, and leaders who reflect the lived
experiences, cultures, and strengths of local families. Through intentional program design, OST
programs function as intergenerational systems of support that foster belonging, strengthen
protective factors, and support prevention, early identification of need, and connection to
appropriate supports.

Investments made pursuant to this chapter strengthen the capacity of existing OST
programs to serve as stabilizing and supportive spaces for youth, mitigate the impacts of reduced
school-day and federally funded supports, and reinforce community-based systems that are built
by and for the communities they serve.
SECTION 2. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
BUILDING OPPORTUNITIES IN OUT-OF-SCHOOL TIME
16-117-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as "Building Opportunities in Out-of-School
Time".
16-117-2. Eligibility and allowable use.
(a) Funds appropriated under this chapter shall support evidence-informed initiatives that
promote the mental health and emotional well-being of children and youth through community-
based or school-affiliated out-of-school time (“OST”) programs serving students in kindergarten
through grade twelve (K-12).
(b) Allowable uses of funds may include, but shall not be limited to:
(1) Mental health first aid training, trauma-informed practices, or related learning
opportunities for OST staff, youth leaders, volunteers, caregivers, or program partners;
(2) Peer support groups, mentoring models, restorative practices, or youth-led initiatives
that foster connection, belonging, and emotional well-being;
(3) Development, purchase, or implementation of materials, curricula, or resources that
support mental health awareness, social-emotional learning, coping skills, and resilience;
(4) Program-based mental health projects, workshops, enrichment activities, or creative
expressions that integrate wellness and prevention into OST programming; and
(5) Other innovative, community-informed, or culturally responsive approaches designed
to support youth mental health, prevention, early identification of need, and connection to
appropriate supports.
(c) Funds shall be used in a manner that allows OST programs to respond flexibly to local
needs and priorities, while promoting developmentally appropriate, inclusive, and supportive
practices for youth and families.
16-117-3. Funding and allocation.
(a) The general assembly shall allocate one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in the
fiscal year 2026–2027 budget to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
LC004660 - Page 2 of 4

(b) Funds shall be administered by the appropriate state agency or by a designated
statewide intermediary, ideally the Rhode Island Afterschool Network, with demonstrated expertise
in out-of-school time systems, youth development, and equitable grantmaking. The administering
entity shall award funds through a competitive process to qualified OST programs, prioritize
programs serving youth with high levels of demonstrated need, ensure distribution across multiple
programs, and consider geographic diversity, including urban, suburban, and rural communities.
16-117-4. Reporting.
The administering agency or intermediary shall submit a brief annual report to the general
assembly detailing the number of OST programs and youth served, the geographic distribution of
funded programs, and a summary of funded activities and observed outcomes.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004660
========
LC004660 - Page 3 of 4